Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-3307
Real property; state or political subdivision; transfer, lease, contract, or agreement; effect.

(1) The State of Nebraska and any municipality, county, or other political subdivision of the state may, in its discretion, with or without consideration, transfer or cause to be transferred to any inland port authority or place in its possession or control, by lease or other contract or agreement, either for a limited period or in fee, any real property within its inland port district.

(2) Nothing in this section shall:

(a) In any way impair, alter, or change any obligations of such entities, contractual or otherwise, existing prior to August 28, 2021; or

(b) Require that any real property located within the boundaries of an inland port district be owned by an inland port authority or the city or county or counties in which such real property is located.

Laws 2021, LB156, § 7;

Laws 2022, LB998, § 6.
April 19, 2022